Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 4

Treasurer—Deposits of Municipal Funds

6-4-401. Appointment and duties of treasurer.

The board shall appoint a treasurer.

The treasurer shall collect, receive and receipt for the taxes and all other revenue and bonds of the municipality, and the proceeds of its bond issues, and disburse them.

The board may appoint the recorder as treasurer.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-4-402. Depositories of municipal funds.

The board, at a regular meeting, shall adopt a resolution to contract with a bank or banks making the best proposal to become the depository of municipal funds.

Before entering into a contract under subdivision (a)(1), the treasurer or an officer appointed by the treasurer shall review and analyze the proposals from the banks and submit an analysis of the proposals to each member of the board at or before the next meeting of the board. The analysis of the proposals should consider the bank or banks proposing the highest interest rate, potential service charges or other fees, factors affecting safety and liquidity of municipal funds, and any other relevant factors.

The board shall require any bank that becomes a depository of municipal funds to secure the funds by collateral in the same manner and under the same conditions as state deposits under title 9, chapter 4, parts 1 and 4, or as provided in a collateral pool created under title 9, chapter 4, part 5.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, at least once every four (4) years, the board shall reevaluate the contracts entered into pursuant to subsection (a). The board shall base its evaluation on proposals obtained from at least two (2) banks. The treasurer or an officer appointed by the treasurer shall prepare a written evaluation of the proposals and preserve the evaluations for at least three (3) years.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1994, ch. 752, § 4; 2019, ch. 277, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote this section, which read: “Depositories of the municipal funds shall be designated by ordinance. The board shall require any financial institution that becomes a depository of municipal funds to secure such funds by collateral in the same manner and under the same conditions as state deposits under title 9, chapter 4, parts 1 and 4, or as provided in a collateral pool created under title 9, chapter 4, part 5.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 277, § 5. July 1, 2019.

Chapters 5-17

[Reserved]